pl: Format nadajnika: Nadajnik osobisty; Z zaciskiem; Wtyk gitarowy; Mobilny; Zintegrowany z zestawem słuchawkowym; Liniowy; Pedał; Nakładany; Montaż w szafie rack; Blat stołu; Adapter USB; Inne
it: Fattore di forma del trasmettitore: Bodypack; Chiusura a scatto; Connettore chitarra; A mano; Integrato in cuffia; In linea; Pedale; A innesto; Montaggio rack; Da tavolo; Dongle USB; Altro
da: Senderens formfaktor: Kropsbåret; Clip-on; Guitarstik; Håndholdt; Headset-integreret; Inline; Pedal; Påstikbar; Rackmonteret; Bordplade; USB-dongle; Andet
el: Μορφή πομπού: Bodypack; Κουμπωτό; Βύσμα κιθάρας; Χειροκίνητη; Ενσωματωμένο σε ακουστικά; Εν σειρά; Πετάλι; Επί του βύσματος; Για ράφι; Επιτραπέζια; USB dongle; Άλλο
ru: Формфактор передатчика: Поясной передатчик; Зажим; Гитарный штекер; Вручную; Встроенный в гарнитуру; Линейный; Педаль; Накамерный; Для стойки; Настольный; USB-адаптер; Другой
bg-BG: Типоразмер на предавателя: За носене на тялото; Clip-on; Китарен щекер; Преносим; Интегриран в слушалки; В линия; Педал; Щепселен; За монтаж в шкаф; Плот за маса; USB донгъл; Други
pt-BR: Formato do transmissor: Bodypack; Clip-on; Plugue para guitarra; Portátil; Integrado ao headset; Em linha; Pedal; Plug-on; Montagem em rack; Tampo de mesa; Dongle USB; Outro
vi: Kiểu dáng bộ phát: Bộ phát thân; Dạng kẹp; Phích cắm guitar; Cầm tay; Tích hợp tai nghe; Trong dây; Bàn đạp; Cắm trực tiếp; Lắp giá đỡ; Trên mặt bàn; USB dongle; Khác
lt-LT: Siųstuvo formos faktorius: Kūno dėklas; Prisegamas; Gitaros kištukas; Rankinis; Integruotas į ausines; Linijinis; Pedalinis; Prijungiamas; Montuojamas steliaže; Stalinis; USB adapteris; Kita
zh-TW: 發射器外型規格: 腰包式; 夾式; 吉他插頭式; 手持式; 頭戴式整合; 線上式; 踏板; 插入式; 機架式; 桌上型; USB 接收器; 其他
es: Factor de forma del transmisor: Petaca; Con clip; Conector de guitarra; Portátil; Integrado en auriculares; En línea; Pedal; De conexión directa; Montaje en rack; Sobremesa; Adaptador USB; Otros
nb: Sender formfaktor: Kroppspakke; Clip-on; Gitarplugg; Håndholdt; Hodetelefon-integrert; I-linje; Pedal; Plugg-på; Rackmontert; Bordplate; USB-dongle; Annet
ja: トランスミッターフォームファクター: ボディパック; クリップ式; ギタープラグ; ハンドヘルド; ヘッドセット一体型; インライン; ペダル; プラグオン; ラックマウント; 卓上; USBドングル; その他
nl: Zender vormfactor: Bodypack; Clip-on; Gitaarplug; Handbediend; Headset-geïntegreerd; In-line; Pedaal; Plug-on; Rackmontage; Tafelblad; USB-dongle; Andere
th: รูปแบบของเครื่องส่ง: แบบติดตัว; แบบหนีบ; แจ็คกีตาร์; แบบมือถือ; ในตัวกับหูฟัง; แบบอินไลน์; แป้นเหยียบ; แบบเสียบต่อ; แบบติดแร็ค; วางของได้; ดองเกิล USB; อื่นๆ
sv: Sändarens formfaktor: Bältessändare; Clip-on; Gitarrplugg; Handhållen; Integrerad i headset; In-line; Pedal; Plug-on; Rackmonterad; Bordsskiva; USB-dongel; Övrigt
fi: Lähettimen muototekijä: Vyölähetin; Klipsillinen; Kitarapistoke; Kädessä pidettävä; Kuulokkeisiin integroitu; Kaapelissa; Polkimet; Pistokelähetin; Räkkiasennettava; Pöydällä pidettävä; USB-sovitin; Muu
pt-PT: Formato do transmissor: Bodypack; Fecho de encaixe; Ficha de guitarra; Dispositivo portátil; Integrado em auricular; Em linha; Pedal; Plug-on; Para rack; Tampo de mesa; Dongle USB; Outro
cs: Provedení vysílače: Bodypack; Klip; Kytarová zástrčka; Ruční; Integrovaný v náhlavní soupravě; In-line; Šlapací; Plug-on; Do racku; Deska stolu; USB dongle; Jiné
zh-CN: 发射器外形: 腰包式; 夹式; 吉他插头式; 手持式; 耳机集成式; 内联式; 踏板; 插入式; 机架式; 桌面; USB 加密狗; 其他
fr: Facteur de forme de l’émetteur: Émetteur de poche; À pince; Fiche guitare; Portatif; Intégré au casque; En ligne; Pédale; Adaptateur enfichable; Montage en rack; De table; Dongle USB; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika oddajnika: Telesni oddajnik; Priponka; Kitarski vtič; Ročna; Vgrajen v slušalke; V liniji; Pedal; Vtični; Za montažo v omarico; Namizni; Ključek USB; Drugo
en: Transmitter form factor: Bodypack; Clip-on; Guitar-plug; Handheld; Headset-integrated; In-line; Pedal; Plug-on; Rackmount; Tabletop; USB dongle; Other
ko: 송신기 폼 팩터: 바디팩; 클립식; 기타 플러그; 휴대용; 헤드셋 일체형; 인라인; 페달; 플러그온; 랙마운트; 테이블탑; USB 동글; 기타
tr: Verici form faktörü: Bel tipi verici; Klipsli; Gitar fişi; Elde taşınan; Kulaklık entegre; Hat içi; Pedallı; Fiş tipi; Raf tipi; Masaüstü; USB dongle; Diğer
hr-HR: Oblik odašiljača: Tjelesni odašiljač; Na kopčanje; Utikač za gitaru; Ručno; Integriran u slušalice; U liniji; Pedala; Utični; Za rack montažu; Stolni; USB dongle; Ostalo
sk-SK: Formát vysielača: Bodypack; Svorka; Gitarový konektor; Ručný; Integrovaný v náhlavnej súprave; In-line; Pedál; Násuvný; Rackmount; Stolový; USB adaptér; Iné
de: Sender-Formfaktor: Taschensender; Zum Anklipsen; Gitarrenstecker; Handgerät; Headset-integriert; In-line; Pedal; Aufsteck-Sender; Rackmontage; Tischgerät; USB-Dongle; Sonstiges
hu: Adó formátuma: Övre csíptethető; Felcsíptethető; Gitár dugó; Kézi; Fejhallgatóba integrált; Vezetékbe épített; Pedálos; Ráhelyezhető dugó; Rack szekrénybe szerelhető; Asztali; USB dongle; Egyéb
ro-RO: Factor de formă transmițător: Transmițător de corp; Cu clemă; Mufă pentru chitară; De mână; Integrat în căști; În linie; Pedală; Cu conectare directă; Pentru montare în rack; Blat; Dongle USB; Altele